Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 1
AIR QUALITY

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Air quality control, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-1.

12-9-1. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as "The Georgia Air Quality Act."

(Code 1933, 88-901, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

12-9-2. Declaration of public policy.

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of Georgia to preserve, protect, and improve air quality and to control emissions to prevent the significant deterioration of air quality and to attain and maintain ambient air quality standards so as to safeguard the public health, safety, and welfare consistent with providing for maximum employment and full industrial development of the state.

((Code 1933, 88-901, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

12-9-3. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Administrator" means the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

"Air-cleaning device" means any method, process, or equipment which removes, reduces, or renders less noxious air contaminants discharged into the atmosphere.

"Air contaminant" means solid or liquid particulate matter, dust, fumes, gas, mist, smoke, or vapor or any matter or substance either physical, chemical, biological, radioactive, including without limitation source material, special nuclear material, and by-product material, or any combination of any of the above.

"Air pollution" means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more air contaminants.

"Ambient air" means that portion of the atmosphere external to facilities to which the general public has access.

"Area of the state" means any city or county or portion thereof or other substantial geographical area of the state as may be designated by the division.

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources of the State of Georgia.

"Compliance plan" means a plan which outlines the methods, procedures, or other means by which the owner, operator, or applicant intends to achieve or maintain compliance with the requirements of this article or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article.

"Construction" means any fabrication, erection, or installation and includes any modification as defined in paragraph (22) of this Code section.

"Control measure" means any equipment, device, process, procedure, material, or method used to reduce emissions from a source in such a manner that the emission reduction can be verified by the director.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources of the State of Georgia or his designee.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources of the State of Georgia.

"Effects on welfare" includes, but is not limited to, effects on soils, water, crops, vegetation, man-made materials, animals, wildlife, weather, visibility, and climate, damage to and deterioration of property, public safety, and hazards to transportation, as well as effects on economic values or development and on personal comfort and well-being.

"Emission" or "emitting" means any discharging, giving off, sending forth, placing, dispensing, scattering, issuing, circulating, releasing, or any other emanation of any air contaminant or contaminants into the atmosphere.

"Emission limitation" means a requirement established which limits the quantity, rate, type, or concentration of emissions of air contaminants, including all means of emission limitation, supplemental or intermittent means of emission limitation, and any requirement relating to the equipment or operation or maintenance of a source to assure emission reduction.

"Emission offset" means a requirement providing for a proportional decrease in the emissions of a quantity or type of air contaminant from a source, facility, or area of the state in order to compensate or counteract the effects of an emission increase from such source, facility, or area of the state.

"Facility" means any stationary source or group of stationary sources located within a contiguous area and under common control that emits or has the potential to emit any air contaminants.

"Federal act" means 42 U.S.C. Section 7401, et seq., as amended.

"Indirect source" means a source or facility which attracts or tends to attract activity that results in emission of any air pollutant for which there is an ambient air standard.

"Manager" means the person appointed, employed, or delegated to the position of small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance office manager.

"Means of emission limitation" means a system of continuous emission reduction, including the use of specific technology or fuels with specified pollution characteristics.

"Modification" means any change in or alteration of fuels, processes, operation, or equipment, including any chemical changes in processes or fuels, which affects the amount or character of any air pollutant emitted or which results in the emission of any air pollutant not previously emitted. No source shall, by reason of a change which decreases emissions, become subject to the new source performance standards of 42 U.S.C. Section 7411, unless required by the federal act. This definition does not apply where the word "modification" is used to refer to action by the director, division, or Board of Natural Resources in modifying or changing rules, regulations, orders, or permits. In that context the word has its ordinary meaning.

"Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, state, municipality, or political subdivision of a state, and any agency, department, or instrumentality of the United States government, or any other entity, and any officer, agent, or employee of any of the above.

"Schedule and timetable of compliance" means a schedule of remedial measures including an enforceable sequence of actions or operations leading to compliance with an emission limitation, other limitation, prohibition, or standard.

"Small business advisory panel" means the small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance advisory panel created by Code Section 12-9-25.

"Small business stationary source or facility" means an entity that:

Is owned or operated by a person employing 100 or fewer individuals;

Is a small business under the federal Small Business Act;

Does not emit 50 tons or more per year of any regulated pollutant; and

Emits less than 75 tons per year of all regulated pollutants and does not qualify as a major stationary source.

"Source" means any property, building, structure, location, equipment, or installation at, from, or by reason of which emissions of air contaminants are or may reasonably be expected to be emitted into the atmosphere. Such term includes both real and personal property, stationary and mobile sources, and direct and indirect sources and both public or private property.

"Standard of performance" means a requirement of continuous emission reduction, including any requirement relating to the equipment, operation, or maintenance of a source to assure continuous emission reduction. A standard of performance for any fossil fuel fired stationary source subject to 42 U.S.C. Section 7411(b) must also produce and result in a percentage reduction in the emissions from such category of sources from the emissions which would have resulted from the use of fuels which are not subject to treatment prior to combustion, as required by 42 U.S.C. Section 7411(a)(1).

"Stationary source" means any source or facility emitting, either directly or indirectly, from a fixed location.

"Supplemental or intermittent means of emission limitation" means all other means of emission limitation other than systems of continuous emission reduction and includes all dispersion dependent techniques.

"Title V permit" means a permit issued by the director which is subject to the permitting requirements and procedures for such permits pursuant to this article and the regulations promulgated pursuant to this article and in accordance with the federal act, 42 U.S.C. Section 7661, et seq., as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

The following terms shall have the same meaning as provided for such terms in the federal act:

Hazardous air pollutants;

Major stationary source;

Mobile source; and

Implementing authority.

(Code 1933, 88-902, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 4; Code 1981, §

12-9-3

enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" in two places in paragraphs (8) and (31).

U.S. Code.

- The "federal act" referred to in this Code section was enacted as the federal Clean Air Act of 1955, 69 Stat. 322, and was originally codified at 42 U.S.C.

§

1857 et seq. The federal Clean Air Act of 1955, as amended, was completely revised by an act known as the federal Clean Air Act Amendments of 1977, Pub. L. 95-95, and was reassigned to 42 U.S.C.

§

7401 et seq.

12-9-4. Designation of division as agency to administer article.

The division is designated as the state agency to administer this article consistent with the policy stated in Code Section 12-9-2.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

12-9-5. Powers and duties of Board of Natural Resources as to air quality generally.

Any hearing officer appointed by the Board of Natural Resources, and all members of five-member committees of the Board of Natural Resources, shall, and at least a majority of members of the entire Board of Natural Resources shall, represent the public interest and shall not derive any significant portion of their income from persons subject to permits or enforcement orders under this article. All potential conflicts of interest shall be adequately disclosed.

In the performance of its duties, the Board of Natural Resources shall have and may exercise the power to:

Adopt, promulgate, revise, modify, amend, and repeal rules and regulations necessary to abate or control air pollution, or necessary to implement any of the provisions of this article or requirements of the federal act imposed on the state as an implementing authority, consistent with the declaration of public policy. Such requirements may be for the state as a whole or may vary from area to area, as may be appropriate to facilitate accomplishment of the policy of this article;

Establish ambient air quality standards for the state, including schedules and timetables for the state to achieve such ambient air quality standards, provided that they are in all cases not less stringent than provided by the federal act;

Establish such standards of performance, emission limitations, emission control standards, and emission offsets for sources or facilities as are necessary to prevent, control, or abate air pollution, to attain and maintain ambient air quality standards, to protect the public health and welfare, and to fulfill the policy of this article, provided that such standards or limitations are no less stringent than the federal act;

Establish contingency provisions, alternative methods, and control measures sufficient to comply with the federal act which will be implemented should the state fail to attain or maintain an ambient air quality standard in the state or in any area of the state in accordance with this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article;

Establish emission reduction measures which are appropriate, necessary, or beneficial in meeting the provisions of this article, including, but not limited to, economic incentives, fees, marketable permits, emission allowances, and auctions of emission rights;

Require the owner or operator of any stationary source or facility to establish and maintain such records; provide such information or make such reports; install, use, and maintain such emission or process monitoring equipment or methods, continuous or otherwise; and sample such emissions, continuous or not, in accordance with such methods or procedures, at such locations or intervals as reasonably may be required to implement this article, and make such records, reports, information, or monitoring results available to the director or administrator upon request, provided that no requirement under this paragraph shall be any less stringent than the federal act;

Require the use of air-cleaning devices, means of emission limitation, whether continuous, supplemental, or intermittent, or control measures and standards of performance so as to achieve and maintain compliance with the provisions of this article and the federal act;

Prevent the significant deterioration of the air quality by establishing air quality standards or air quality increments limiting the maximum allowable amounts of air pollutants or air contaminants which a source or facility is allowed to emit; provided, however, that such limits are sufficient to comply with the federal act;

Establish standards of performance, emission limitations, and emission control standards and control measures for mobile sources of air pollution and nonroad engines, provided that no requirement under this paragraph shall be less stringent than those contained in the federal act;

Establish, revise, or modify emission limitations, emission control standards, or control measures for stationary sources or facilities in areas of the state where such sources or facilities significantly contribute to nonattainment of an ambient air quality standard or significantly contribute to a significant deterioration of air quality in the state, an area of the state, or another state; provided, however, that no requirement under this paragraph shall be less stringent than the requirements for such source or facility under this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article;

Establish, revise, modify, and amend emission limitations, emission control standards, or standards of performance limiting the total quantity of air contaminants or emissions which may be emitted by a source, facility, or area of the state;

Establish a program for prevention and mitigation of accidental releases of hazardous air contaminants or air pollutants into the ambient air or within a facility; establish, revise, amend, and modify rules and regulations for program implementation; and require reasonable precautionary and response measures to safeguard public health and public safety including, but not limited to, monitoring hazardous or potentially hazardous air contaminants and air pollutants, record keeping, inspection, control measures, safety procedures, emergency response procedures, training, prevention planning, education, emission control standards, emission limitations, and other necessary safety measures; and the board may require any source or facility subject to this paragraph to obtain a Title V permit;

Establish training and educational programs to ensure the proper operation and utilization of emission control equipment, safety procedures, emission control alternatives, and the dissemination of air quality information to the public;

Establish standards for the construction of new stationary sources or facilities or modification of an existing source or facility in areas where the national ambient air standards are not met or in other areas contributing to the air pollution of such areas only after imposing requirements and appropriate emission offsets or reductions no less stringent than the requirements of the federal act;

Establish requirements for preconstruction or premodification review procedures prior to the construction of any new stationary source or facility or modification of any existing stationary source or facility sufficient to allow the director to make determinations that the proposed construction or modification will not cause or contribute to a failure to attain or maintain any ambient air quality standard, a significant deterioration of air quality, or a violation of any applicable emission limitation or standard of performance; and to require that prior to commencing construction or modification, any person proposing such construction or modification shall submit required information to the director. Such preconstruction and premodification review requirements shall be no less stringent than and shall require that no proposed source or facility may be permitted unless such source or facility meets all the requirements for review and for obtaining a permit prescribed in this article and in accordance with the federal act;

Establish a program to reduce the adverse effects of acid deposition through the reduction of annual emissions of sulfur dioxide and nitrogen oxides within the state sufficient to comply with the requirements of 42 U.S.C. Section 7651, et seq., of the federal act; and

Establish satisfactory processes of consultation and cooperation with local governments or other designated organizations of elected officials or federal agencies for purposes of planning, implementing, and determining requirements under this article to the extent required by the federal act.

(Code 1933, 88-903, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 184, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 994, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1529; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1285, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" throughout this Code section and a comma was added following "standards" in paragraph (b)(2).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "42 U.S.C." was substituted for "42 U.S.C" in paragraph (b)(16).

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Air quality control, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection Division, Chapter 391-3-1.

12-9-6. Powers and duties of director as to air quality generally.

The director shall represent the public interest and shall not derive a significant portion of his income from persons subject to rules, regulations, permits, or orders under this article. Any potential conflict of interest shall be adequately disclosed.

The director shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

To exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this article and all rules, regulations, and orders promulgated under this article;

To encourage, participate in, or conduct such studies, reviews, investigations, research, emission inventories, and demonstrations relating to air quality or sources of air pollution in this state as he deems advisable and necessary or as may be required by the federal act and to provide any data or information obtained from such activities to the administrator;

To issue permits contemplated by this article, stipulating in each permit the conditions or limitations under which such permit is issued, and to deny, revoke, modify, or amend permits;

To establish, implement, revise, and amend permit application criteria, forms, procedures, and requirements consistent with this article;

To establish expedited procedures to respond to requests from small business stationary sources for changes in any work practice or technical method of compliance or schedule of milestones for implementing such work practice or method of compliance preceding any applicable compliance date, based on the technological and financial capability of any such small business stationary source or facility; provided, however, that no such change shall be granted unless it is in compliance with the applicable requirements;

To advise, consult, cooperate, and contract on air quality matters with persons for purposes of carrying out the powers and duties conferred upon the director pursuant to this article; provided, however, that when negotiating and entering into agreements with the governments of other states or the United States and their several agencies, subdivisions, or designated organizations of elected officials the director shall first obtain the approval of the Governor;

To conduct such public hearings as he deems necessary for the proper administration of this article;

To collect and disseminate information and to provide for public notification in matters relating to air quality. The director shall make publicly available on the division's website information regarding any spill or release of ethylene oxide reported to the division pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-9-7;

To collect fees, assessments, penalties, or other payments provided for by this article;

To issue orders as may be necessary to enforce compliance with this article and all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article;

To institute, in the name of the division, proceedings of mandamus, injunction, or other proper administrative, civil, or criminal proceedings to enforce the provisions of this article;

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this article;

To prepare, develop, amend, modify, submit, and enforce a comprehensive plan or plans sufficient to comply with the federal act including emission control and limitation requirements, standards of performance, preconstruction review, and other requirements for the prevention, abatement, and control of air pollution in this state, for the prevention of significant deterioration of air quality, for protection against hazardous air pollutants, and for the achievement and maintenance of ambient air quality standards;

To encourage voluntary cooperation by persons and affected groups to achieve the purposes of this article; and

To receive, accept, hold, use, and administer on behalf of the state and for purposes provided in this article gifts, grants, donations, devises, and bequests of real, personal, and mixed property of every kind and description.

The powers and duties described in this Code section may be exercised and performed by the director through such duly authorized agents and employees as he deems necessary and proper.

(Code 1933, 88-904, 88-905, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 739, § 2/SB 426.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added the second sentence to paragraph (b)(8).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" throughout this Code section.

12-9-7. Permit required; report of spill or release of ethylene oxide; application; issuance; revocation, suspension, or amendment.

As used in this subsection, the term "spill or release" shall have the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (10) of Code Section 12-14-1.

No person shall, and it shall be unlawful and a violation of this article to, construct, install, modify, own, or operate any facility or stationary source or any equipment, device, article, or process capable of causing or contributing to the emission of air contaminants from such source or facility or designed to prevent air pollution from such facility or source unless permitted by and in compliance with a permit from the director. A permit shall be issued to an applicant on evidence satisfactory to the director of compliance with this article and any standards, limitations, requirements, or rules and regulations pursuant to this article. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the director shall not issue a Title V permit to a facility or source if the administrator objects in writing and in a timely manner to the issuance of such permit.

As a condition of a permit for operations that include the emission of ethylene oxide, any spill or release of ethylene oxide, regardless of the amount, shall be reported to the division in writing within 24 hours of discovering such spill or release. Any person who violates such reporting requirement shall be subject to penalties under Article 1 of this chapter.

Applications for permits shall be submitted in such manner, on such forms, and contain such information as the director prescribes and which he deems necessary to make a determination of compliance with this article and the rules and regulation promulgated pursuant to this article. The director may develop and require the use of standard application forms and establish evaluation criteria for expediently determining the completeness of such applications; provided, however, that the director at a minimum shall establish forms and criteria necessary to comply with the federal act. In addition to any other criteria established by the director, all permit applications shall be accompanied by:

A compliance plan containing such schedules, reports, plans, documentation, and other information as may be required by the rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this article and such additional information as the director may require to demonstrate a source's or facility's compliance or proposed compliance with the requirements of this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article; and

Any and all applicable fees for processing the permit application and any other fee which the source or facility must pay pursuant to this article.

Permits shall be issued as follows:

Title V permits shall be issued for a fixed term not to exceed five years, except where a shorter term is provided for by this article or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article. A single permit may be issued for a facility with multiple sources of air contaminants; provided, however, that the permit requires each source to comply with this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article;

Permits issued by the director in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Section 7651, et seq., to reduce the adverse effects of acid deposition through the reduction of annual emissions of sulphur dioxide and nitrogen oxides within the state shall be for a fixed term of five years;

Permits issued for solid waste combustion incinerators shall be issued for a fixed term of 12 years. The director shall review the permit every five years to determine if such permit needs to be amended, revised, or modified;

(3.1) Permits issued for biomass boilers shall prohibit the use of railroad ties treated with creosote compounds or treated with naphthenate compounds for purposes of commercial electricity generation, unless the boiler also provides steam or electricity to any co-located forest products processing plant;

The board may provide by rule or regulation authority for the director to issue, after notice and opportunity for public hearing, a general permit covering numerous similar sources. Any general permit shall comply with all requirements applicable to permits under 42 U.S.C. Section 7661, et seq., as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. No facility or source covered by a general permit shall be relieved from the obligation to file an application pursuant to the requirements of this article; and

All other permits shall be issued for a term as provided for by this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article.

The director shall provide to the administrator a copy of each Title V permit proposed to be issued and issued as a final permit.

The director may revoke, suspend, or amend any permit issued, for cause, including but not limited to the following:

Violation of any condition of such permit or failure to comply with a final order of the director;

Failure to comply with any applicable rules or regulations in effect pursuant to this article;

Obtaining a permit by misrepresentation, failure to disclose fully all relevant facts, failure to inform the division of modifications affecting emissions, or failure to inform the division of changes in operation which affect emissions and which are required to be reported to the division pursuant to this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article; or

Modifications which affect emissions.

The director may amend or modify any permit issued, for cause, including but not limited to the following:

Modifications which affect emissions; or

Application by the permittee requesting modification or amendment of the permittee's permit.

Except as provided elsewhere in this article, possession of an approved Title V permit shall constitute compliance with the applicable emission limitations or standards of performance or rules and regulations or with any other provision of this article or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to or in effect under this article, to the extent specifically enumerated and provided in such permit.

Any permit issued by the director or any modification, revocation, suspension, or amendment of a permit shall become final unless a petition for hearing is filed in accordance with Code Section 12-9-15.

Failure by the director to make a decision to issue, deny, or review a permit within 18 months from the date a completed permit application is received shall be considered a refusal to issue, and the permittee may request review in accordance with Code Section 12-9-15. If the permittee does not request such review within 30 days after the expiration of such 18 month period, the permit shall be denied as a final agency action; provided, however, that for initial permit applications submitted pursuant to subsection (j) of this Code section, the director shall have three years from the submission deadline to process and issue or deny all completed permit applications. Of the completed applications submitted pursuant to subsection (j) of this Code section the director shall, at a minimum, process one-third of the applications in the first year, one-third of the applications in the second year, and the remaining applications in the third year.

Every person in possession of an air quality permit issued pursuant to this article prior to July 1, 1992, and who is required to obtain a Title V permit and any person without such permit who has or intends to construct, install, modify, own, or operate any stationary facility or source or any equipment, device, article, or process capable of causing or contributing to the emission of air contaminants from such source or designed to prevent air pollution from said source and which is required to obtain a Title V permit shall submit a completed permit application pursuant to this article to the director within one year after the date this article and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article are approved by the administrator as complying with the federal act.

(Ga. L. 1978, p. 275, § 9; Code 1981, §

12-9-8

; Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Code 1981, §

12-9-7

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 12; Ga. L. 2020, p. 649, § 1/HB 857; Ga. L. 2020, p. 739, § 1/SB 426.)

The 2020 amendments.

The first 2020 amendment, effective August 4, 2020, added paragraph (c)(3.1). The second 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, added paragraph (a)(1), redesignated former subsection (a) as paragraph (a)(2) and added paragraph (a)(3).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "article" was substituted for "chapter" throughout this Code section.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, in subsection (a) (now subsection (c)), "et seq.," was substituted for "et seq." in paragraphs (2) and (4) and "U.S.C." was substituted for "U.S.C" in paragraph (4).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, a semicolon was substituted for a period at the end of paragraph (c)(3.1).

Editor's notes.

- Former Code Section 12-9-7, specifying factors to be considered in exercising powers and responsibilities relating to prevention, control, etc., of air pollution, was repealed by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886,

§

1, effective July 1, 1992, and was based on Ga. L. 1967, p. 581,

§

1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1522,

§

1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 275,

§

8.

12-9-8. Renewal or revision of permit.

Upon proper application, the director may renew, revise, modify, amend, or reissue a permit for an additional term.

If an application for permit renewal has not been denied or a renewal permit issued by the date the current permit expires or if issuance or denial of the permit renewal is contested pursuant to Code Section

12-9-15

and administrative or judicial review has not resulted in a final determination by the date the current permit expires, the conditions of the current permit shall remain binding and enforceable until such time as a final determination on the permit renewal is issued.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886,

§

1, effective July 1, 1992, redesignated former Code Section 12-9-8 as present Code Section 12-9-7.

12-9-9. Notice requirements for permit applications and actions regarding permits.

Upon receipt of a completed application for issuance of a Title V permit or a Title V permit modification, amendment, or renewal and as otherwise provided by rule or regulation, the director shall:

Require a public notice to be published in a paper of general circulation in the county in which the source or facility proposes to operate notifying the citizens that an application for a permit has been received and providing the public with an opportunity to request a public hearing and submit public comment. All such notices shall include a brief description of the proposed activity. Responsibility for publishing such notice shall rest with the applicant;

Transmit to the administrator a copy of the application or such portion thereof as the administrator may require to review the application and to carry out the administrator's responsibility under the federal act; and

Notify all states whose air quality may be affected and that are contiguous to the state or that are within 50 miles of the source of each permit application or proposed permit forwarded to the administrator under this Code section. The director shall provide an opportunity for such states to submit written recommendations respecting the issuance of the permit and its terms and conditions. If any part of those recommendations are not accepted by the director, the director shall notify the state submitting the recommendations and the administrator in writing of the director's reasons for not accepting those recommendations.

In the event of a modification, amendment, suspension, or a revocation of a permit, the director shall serve written notice of such action on the permit holder and shall set forth in such notice the reasons for the action.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886, § 1.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1992, p. 2886,

§

1, effective July 1, 1992, redesignated former Code Section 12-9-9 as present Code Section 12-9-10.